Hawaii statutes.
[§663B-1] Definitions. As used in this
[chapter], unless the context otherwise requires:

"Engages in an equine activity" means
riding, training, assisting in medical treatment or physical therapy of,
driving, or being a passenger upon an equine, whether mounted or unmounted, or
any person assisting a participant or show management. The term does not
include being a spectator at an equine activity, except in cases where a
spectator places oneself in an unauthorized area and in immediate proximity to
the equine activity.

"Equine" means a horse, pony, mule,
donkey, or hinny.

"Equine activity" means:

(1) Equine shows, fairs, competitions, performances,
or parades that involve any or all breeds of equines and any of the equine
disciplines, including, but not limited to, dressage, hunter and jumper horse
shows, grand prix jumping, three-day events, combined training, rodeos,
driving, pulling, cutting, polo, steeplechasing, English and western
performance riding, endurance trail riding and western games, and hunting;

(2) Equine training or teaching activities, or both;

(3) Boarding equines;

(4) Riding, inspecting, or evaluating an equine
belonging to another whether or not the owner has received some monetary
consideration or other thing of value for the use of the equine or is
permitting a prospective purchaser of the equine to ride, inspect, or evaluate
the equine;

(5) Rides, trips, hunts, or other equine activities
of any type however informal or impromptu that are sponsored by an equine
activity sponsor; and

(6) Placing or replacing horseshoes on an equine.

"Equine activity sponsor" means an
individual, group, club, partnership, or corporation, whether or not the
sponsor is operating for profit or nonprofit, which sponsors, organizes, or
provides the facilities for, an equine activity, including, but not limited to
pony clubs, 4-H clubs, hunt clubs, riding clubs, school and college-sponsored
classes, programs, and activities, therapeutic riding programs, and operators,
instructors, and promoters of equine facilities, including, but not limited to
stables, clubhouses, ponyride strings, fairs, and arenas at which the activity
is held.

"Equine professional" means a person
engaged for compensation in instructing a participant or renting to a
participant an equine for the purpose of riding, driving, or being a passenger
upon the equine, or in renting equipment or tack to a participant.

"Inherent risks of equine activities"
means those dangers or conditions which are an integral part of equine
activities, including, but not limited to:

(1) The propensity of an equine to behave in ways
that may result in injury, harm, or death to persons on or around them;

(2) The unpredictability of an equine's reaction to
such things as sounds, sudden movement, and unfamiliar objects, persons, or
other animals;

(3) Certain hazards such as surface and subsurface
conditions;

(4) Collisions with other equines or objects; and

(5) The potential of a participant to act in a
negligent manner that may contribute to injury to the participant or others,
such as failing to maintain control over the animal or not acting within the
participant's ability.

"Participant" means any person,
whether amateur or professional, who engages in an equine activity, whether or
not a fee is paid to participate in the equine activity. [L 1994, c 249,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next